Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 14 Financial Integrity and Accountability

35-14-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Financial Integrity and Accountability Act of 1986.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, § 1.

35-14-2.
Policy.

The legislature hereby finds that:

Fraud and errors in state programs are more likely to occur from a lack of sufficient internal control structures at state agencies;

Effective internal control structures provide the basic foundation upon which public accountability must be built;

An entity’s system of internal control structures consists of policies and procedures designed to provide management with reasonable assurance that the agency achieves its objectives and goals including:

Reliability of financial reporting;

Compliance with applicable laws and regulations; and

Effectiveness and efficiency of operations.

Internal control structures are necessarily dynamic and must be continuously evaluated and, where necessary, improved; and

Reports addressing the adequacy of the internal control structure of each state agency are necessary to enable the executive branch, the legislature, and the public to evaluate the agency’s performance of its public responsibilities and accountability.

The legislature declares that:

The management of each state agency is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate internal control structure and policies and procedures for financial reporting;

Each state agency shall perform an assessment and produce a report on the effectiveness of the internal control structure and procedures for financial reporting and, when detected, weaknesses must be promptly corrected; and

All levels of management of the state agencies must be involved in assessing and strengthening the systems of internal control structures to minimize fraud, errors, abuse, and waste of government funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 196, § 1.

35-14-3.
Agency responsibilities.

State agency heads are responsible for the establishment and maintenance of a system or systems of internal accounting and administrative control within their agencies. This responsibility includes:

Documenting the system;

Communicating system requirements to employees; and

Assuring that the system is functioning as prescribed and is modified, as appropriate, for changes in conditions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, § 1.

35-14-4.
Internal accounting controls.

Internal accounting and administrative controls are the methods through which reasonable assurances can be given that measures adopted by state agency heads to safeguard assets, check the accuracy and reliability of accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed managerial policies are being followed. The elements of a satisfactory system of internal accounting and administrative control shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

A plan of organization that provides segregation of duties appropriate for proper safeguarding of state agency assets;

A plan that limits access to state agency assets to authorized personnel who require these assets in the performance of their assigned duties;

A system of authorization and recordkeeping procedures adequate to provide effective accounting control over assets, liabilities, revenues, and expenditures;

An established system of practices to be followed in performance of duties and functions in each of the state agencies;

Personnel of a quality commensurate with their responsibilities; and

An effective system of internal review.

State agency heads shall follow these standards of internal accounting and administrative control in carrying out the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, § 1.

35-14-5.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Controller” means the state controller.

“Director” means the director of administration.

“Governor” means the governor of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, § 1.

35-14-6.
Annual report.

To ensure that the requirements of this chapter are fully complied with, the head of each agency shall prepare and submit a report on the adequacy of the agency’s systems of internal accounting and administrative control by December 31 of each year.

The report, including the state agency’s response to report recommendations, shall be signed by the head of the agency and addressed to the governor. Copies of the reports shall be forwarded to the legislature, the auditor general, and the director. Copies of these reports shall also be forwarded to the state library, where they shall be available for public inspection.

By January 1, 1987, the director, in consultation with the auditor general and the controller, shall establish a system of reporting and a general framework to guide the agencies in performing evaluations on their systems of internal accounting and administrative control. The director, in consultation with the auditor general and the controller, may modify the format for the report or the framework for conducting the evaluations from time to time as deemed necessary.

Any material inadequacy or material weakness in an agency’s systems of internal accounting and administrative control which prevents the head of the agency from stating that the agency’s systems of internal accounting and administrative control provided reasonable assurances that each of the objectives specified in §

35-14-4

was achieved shall be identified and the plans and schedule for correcting the inadequacy described in detail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, § 1.